Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Chapter 26 Wyoming Fair Housing Act
§ 40-26-145.
Records exempt.

A complaint filed with the enforcing authority under W.S.

40-26-118

is an open record. Information obtained during an investigation conducted by the enforcing authority under this chapter can be used in any judicial proceedings or administrative hearing relating to the complaint under this chapter or before the administrative closure of a complaint by the enforcing authority. The enforcing authority may disclose to the complainant or the respondent, or representatives of the complainant or respondent, information obtained during an investigation if deemed necessary by the enforcing authority for securing an appropriate resolution of a complaint. The enforcing authority may disclose information obtained during an investigation to a federal agency if necessary for the processing of complaints under an agreement with the agency. Individually identifiable health information obtained during an investigation may not be disclosed by the enforcing authority except to a federal agency if necessary for the processing of complaints under an agreement with the agency. Statements made or actions taken during conciliation efforts relating to a complaint under this chapter may not be disclosed by the enforcing authority, except to a federal agency if necessary for the processing of complaints under an agreement with the agency, and may not be used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding under this chapter without the written consent of the parties to the conciliation. A conciliation agreement is an open record unless the complainant and respondent agree that it is not and the enforcing authority determines that disclosure is not necessary to further the purposes of this chapter.

History.

2015 ch. 171, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.